Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2305
Multistate employer; transmission of reports.

An employer that has employees who are employed in two or more states and that transmits reports magnetically or electronically may comply with the New Hire Reporting Act by designating one of such states in which the employer has employees as the state to which the employer will transmit the report described in section 48-2303. Any Nebraska employer that transmits reports pursuant to this section shall notify the department in writing of the state which such employer designates for the purpose of transmitting reports.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 219.